src/hyphenation/hyphenate.twolc
Alphabet

! Basic finnish alphabet
a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s š t u v w x y z ž å ä ö
A B C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q R S Š T U V W X Y Z Ž Å Ä Ö

! digits
1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 %0

! basic punctuation
‐ –
’ %" ” »

0:%~2 0:%~3 0:%~4
%':%~3 ’:%~3

%{#%}:%~1
%-:%-
%{##%}:0
%{%-%}:%~1
%{% %}:% 
%{%_%}:%~1
;

Sets

Vowels = a e i o u y ä ö A E I O U Y Ä Ö ;
Consonants = b c d f g h j k l m n p q r s š t v w x z ž B C D F G H J K L M N P Q R S Š T V W X Z Ž ;

Definitions
WordBoundary = [#: | %{#%}: | %{##%}: | %{%_%}: | %{%-%}: | %  | %- ] ;

Rules
! Hyphenation in order of priority
! 1. on compound boundary
! 2. before last consonant of a consonant cluster that is between vowels
! 3. between vowel pairs that do not form long vowel or diphthong;
!    diphthongs are:
!    ai, ei, oi, ui, yi, äi, öi, au, eu, iu, ou, äy, öy, uo, yö, iy, ey ja ie
! 4. following diphtongs in non-stressed syllable, trivowelic contexts, etc.:
!    ie, ...
! 5. intervowelic k:0

"Hyphenate Before consonant clusters"
0:%~2 <=> Vowels Consonants* _ Consonants Vowels ;

"Hyphenate between non-diphtongs"
0:%~3 <=>
	Vx _ Vy ; where Vx in (a a a a a e e e e i i i i o o o o o u u u u u y y y y y ä ä ä ä ä ö ö ö ö)
					Vy in (e o y ä ö a o ä ö a o ä ö a e y ä ö a e y ä ö e ä a o u e ö a o u ä a o u) matched ;

"Hyphenate diphtongs in certain contexts"
0:%~4 <=> ! Vowels Vx _ Vy ;
!	Vx _ Vy Vowels ; ! these block too many nice diphtongs
	WordBoundary Consonants* [Vowels+ Consonants+]+ Vx _ Vy ;
				  where Vx in (a e o u y ä ö a e i o ä ö u y i e i)
						Vy in (i i i i i i i u u u u y y o ö y y e) matched ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-twol:
